Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-5,103
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that (1) it is in the public interest for commercial broadband suppliers and electric utilities to enter into broadband facility agreements and (2) the use of electric utility easements and electric utility infrastructure for commercial broadband facilities pursuant to a broadband facility agreement does not diminish the value of underlying real estate.

Laws 2020, LB992, § 2.